Maryland, session 2025, HB0118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 6–601 through 6–604 and the subtitle “Subtitle 6. Interstate Agreement on
Qualifications of Educational Personnel” of Article – Education of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Education
6–126.
(a) (1) This subsection applies to individuals who have graduated from a
teacher preparation program or an alternative teacher preparation program.
(2) Beginning on July 1, 2025, to qualify for an initial certificate an
individual shall:
(i) Pass the subject–specific examinations under § 6–125 of this
subtitle;
(ii) Meet one of the following qualifications:
1. Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, pass a
nationally recognized, portfolio–based assessment of teaching ability; or
2. Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, complete a
rigorous local school system teacher induction program that lasts for the lesser of:
A. 3 years; or
B. The amount of time a teacher may hold a conditional
teacher certificate;
(iii) Meet one of the following qualifications:
1. Pass a basic literacy skills assessment approved by the
Department under § 6–125 of this subtitle;
2. Hold a degree from a regionally accredited educational
institution and have earned a minimum overall cumulative grade point average of 3.0 on a
4.0 scale or its equivalent on the most recently earned degree; or
3. Submit documentation to the Department of having
received effective evaluations from a local school system for 3 years;

HOUSE BILL 118 3
(iv) Pass a rigorous State–specific examination of mastery of reading
instruction and content for the grade level the individual will be teaching; and
(v) Satisfactorily complete any other requirements established by
the State Board.
(3) An individual who graduates from a teacher preparation program in
the State who passed a nationally recognized, portfolio–based assessment may not be
required to take the assessment more than one time.
(4) (i) In order to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (2)(ii)2 of this
subsection, a candidate for an initial teacher certificate shall submit documentation to the
Department that the candidate has completed a rigorous comprehensive induction
program, established in accordance with § 6–117 of this subtitle, that meets the
requirements of this paragraph.
(ii) The comprehensive induction program shall be developed by a
local school system, either independently or collaboratively with other local school systems.
(iii) Before establishing a comprehensive induction program, one or
more local school systems shall submit a plan for the program to the Department and the
Accountability and Implementation Board.
(iv) The comprehensive induction program shall include a locally
developed portfolio component that is aligned with the Interstate Teacher Assessment and
Support Consortium Standards.
(v) A teacher preparation program or an alternative teacher
preparation program may use the locally developed portfolio component under
subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph as meeting a portion of the coursework requirements
of the program.
(vi) A candidate who satisfactorily completes a comprehensive
induction program established in accordance with this paragraph may not be required to
pass a nationally recognized, portfolio–based assessment of teaching ability.
(b) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A TEACHER WHO HOLDS A
PROFESSIONAL LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE FROM A STATE FOR WHICH THE LICENSE
OR CERTIFICATE IS ACCEPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE INTERSTATE TEACHER
MOBILITY COMPACT UNDER SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) In addition to any other requirements established by the State Board,
to qualify for a certificate in the State, a teacher who graduated from an institution of
higher education in another state or holds a professional license or certificate from another
state shall:

HOUSE BILL 118
[(1)] (I) Pass an examination of teaching ability within 18 months of
being hired by a local school system;
[(2)] (II) Hold an active National Board Certification from the National
Board for Professional Teaching Standards; or
[(3)] (III) Complete a comprehensive induction program in accordance with
subsection (a)(4) of this section.
(c) (1) The Department, after a reasonable period of review and assessment,
shall determine whether one of the assessments of teaching skill approved for initial
teacher certification under this section more adequately measures the skills and knowledge
required of a highly qualified teacher.
(2) If the Department makes a determination under paragraph (1) of this
subsection that requires a revision to the statutory requirements for initial teacher
certification, the Department shall, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, submit a report to the General Assembly on or before the next September 1 on its
recommendations for revising the qualifications for initial teacher certification.
(d) (1) The Department shall actively monitor and assess, during their
implementation and development, new teacher standards and assessments produced under
this section for any negative impact on the diversity of teacher candidates passing the
initial teacher certification assessments.
(2) The Department shall report the results of its monitoring and
assessment to the Accountability and Implementation Board established under § 5–402 of
this article.
SUBTITLE 6. INTERSTATE TEACHER MOBILITY COMPACT.
6–601.
THE INTERSTATE TEACHER MOBILITY COMPACT IS HEREBY ENACTED AND
ENTERED INTO WITH ALL OTHER JURISDICTIONS THAT LEGALLY JOIN IN THIS
COMPACT IN THE FORM SUBSTANTIALLY AS THE COMPACT APPEARS IN THIS
SECTION AS FOLLOWS:
ARTICLE I. PURPOSE.
THE PURPOSE OF THIS COMPACT IS TO FACILITATE THE MOBILITY OF
TEACHERS ACROSS THE MEMBER STATES, WITH THE GOAL OF SUPPORTING
TEACHERS THROUGH A NEW PATHWAY TO LICENSURE. THROUGH THIS COMPACT,
THE MEMBER STATES SEEK TO ESTABLISH A COLLECTIVE REGULATORY

HOUSE BILL 118 5
FRAMEWORK THAT EXPEDITES AND ENHANCES THE ABILITY OF TEACHERS TO MOVE
ACROSS STATE LINES.
THIS COMPACT IS INTENDED TO ACHIEVE THE FOLLOWING OBJECTIVES AND
SHOULD BE INTERPRETED ACCORDINGLY. THE MEMBER STATES HEREBY RATIFY
THE SAME INTENTIONS BY SUBSCRIBING HERETO.
A. CREATE A STREAMLINED PATHWAY TO LICENSURE MOBILITY FOR
TEACHERS;
B. SUPPORT THE RELOCATION OF ELIGIBLE MILITARY SPOUSES;
C. FACILITATE AND ENHANCE THE EXCHANGE OF LICENSURE,
INVESTIGATIVE, AND DISCIPLINARY INFORMATION BETWEEN THE MEMBER
STATES;
D. ENHANCE THE POWER OF STATE AND DISTRICT LEVEL EDUCATION
OFFICIALS TO HIRE QUALIFIED, COMPETENT TEACHERS BY REMOVING BARRIERS
TO THE EMPLOYMENT OF OUT–OF–STATE TEACHERS;
E. SUPPORT THE RETENTION OF TEACHERS IN THE PROFESSION BY
REMOVING BARRIERS TO RE–LICENSURE IN A NEW STATE; AND
F. MAINTAIN STATE SOVEREIGNTY IN THE REGULATION OF THE TEACHING
PROFESSION.
ARTICLE II. DEFINITIONS.
AS USED IN THIS COMPACT, AND EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED, THE
FOLLOWING DEFINITIONS SHALL GOVERN THE TERMS HEREIN:
A. “ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER” MEANS ANY PERSON WITH FULL–TIME
DUTY STATUS IN THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES, INCLUDING
MEMBERS OF THE NATIONAL GUARD AND RESERVE.
B. “ADVERSE ACTION” MEANS ANY LIMITATION OR RESTRICTION IMPOSED
BY A MEMBER STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY, SUCH AS REVOCATION,
SUSPENSION, REPRIMAND, PROBATION, OR LIMITATION ON THE LICENSEE’S
ABILITY TO WORK AS A TEACHER.
C. “BYLAWS” MEANS THOSE BYLAWS ESTABLISHED BY THE COMMISSION.

HOUSE BILL 118
D. “CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION LICENSE” MEANS A CURRENT,
VALID AUTHORIZATION ISSUED BY A MEMBER STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY
ALLOWING AN INDIVIDUAL TO SERVE AS A TEACHER IN P–12 PUBLIC EDUCATIONAL
SETTINGS IN A SPECIFIC CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION AREA.
E. “CHARTER MEMBER STATES” MEANS A MEMBER STATE THAT HAS
ENACTED LEGISLATION TO ADOPT THIS COMPACT WHERE SUCH LEGISLATION
PREDATES THE INITIAL MEETING OF THE COMMISSION AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE
OF THE COMPACT.
F. “COMMISSION” MEANS THE INTERSTATE ADMINISTRATIVE BODY
WHOSE MEMBERSHIP CONSISTS OF DELEGATES OF ALL STATES THAT HAVE
ENACTED THIS COMPACT, AND WHICH IS KNOWN AS THE INTERSTATE TEACHER
MOBILITY COMPACT COMMISSION.
G. “COMMISSIONER” MEANS THE DELEGATE OF A MEMBER STATE.
H. “ELIGIBLE LICENSE” MEANS A LICENSE TO ENGAGE IN THE TEACHING
PROFESSION THAT REQUIRES AT LEAST A BACHELOR’S DEGREE AND THE
COMPLETION OF A STATE APPROVED PROGRAM FOR TEACHER LICENSURE.
I. “ELIGIBLE MILITARY SPOUSE” MEANS THE SPOUSE OF ANY INDIVIDUAL
IN FULL–TIME DUTY STATUS IN THE ACTIVE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES
INCLUDING MEMBERS OF THE NATIONAL GUARD AND RESERVE MOVING AS A
RESULT OF A MILITARY MISSION OR MILITARY CAREER PROGRESSION
REQUIREMENTS OR ON THEIR TERMINAL MOVE AS A RESULT OF SEPARATION OR
RETIREMENT (TO INCLUDE SURVIVING SPOUSES OF DECEASED MILITARY
MEMBERS).
J. “EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE” MEANS A GROUP OF COMMISSIONERS
ELECTED OR APPOINTED TO ACT ON BEHALF OF, AND WITHIN THE POWERS
GRANTED TO THEM BY, THE COMMISSION AS PROVIDED FOR HEREIN.
K. “LICENSING AUTHORITY” MEANS AN OFFICIAL, AGENCY, BOARD, OR
OTHER ENTITY OF A STATE THAT IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE LICENSING AND
REGULATION OF TEACHERS AUTHORIZED TO TEACH IN P–12 PUBLIC EDUCATIONAL
SETTINGS.
L. “MEMBER STATE” MEANS ANY STATE THAT HAS ADOPTED THIS
COMPACT, INCLUDING ALL AGENCIES AND OFFICIALS OF SUCH A STATE.
M. “RECEIVING STATE” MEANS ANY STATE WHERE A TEACHER HAS
APPLIED FOR LICENSURE UNDER THIS COMPACT.

HOUSE BILL 118 7
N. “RULE” MEANS ANY REGULATION PROMULGATED BY THE COMMISSION
UNDER THIS COMPACT, WHICH SHALL HAVE THE FORCE OF LAW IN EACH MEMBER
STATE.
O. “STATE” MEANS A STATE, TERRITORY, OR POSSESSION OF THE UNITED
STATES, AND THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA.
P. “STATE PRACTICE LAWS” MEANS A MEMBER STATE’S LAWS, RULES,
AND REGULATIONS THAT GOVERN THE TEACHING PROFESSION, DEFINE THE SCOPE
OF SUCH PROFESSION, AND CREATE THE METHODS AND GROUNDS FOR IMPOSING
DISCIPLINE.
Q. “STATE SPECIFIC REQUIREMENTS” MEANS A REQUIREMENT FOR
LICENSURE COVERED IN COURSEWORK OR EXAMINATION THAT INCLUDES CONTENT
OF UNIQUE INTEREST TO THE STATE.
R. “TEACHER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO CURRENTLY HOLDS AN
AUTHORIZATION FROM A MEMBER STATE THAT FORMS THE BASIS FOR
EMPLOYMENT IN THE P–12 PUBLIC SCHOOLS OF THE STATE TO PROVIDE
INSTRUCTION IN A SPECIFIC SUBJECT AREA, GRADE LEVEL, OR STUDENT
POPULATION.
S. “UNENCUMBERED LICENSE” MEANS A CURRENT, VALID
AUTHORIZATION ISSUED BY A MEMBER STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY ALLOWING
AN INDIVIDUAL TO SERVE AS A TEACHER IN P–12 PUBLIC EDUCATIONAL SETTINGS.
AN UNENCUMBERED LICENSE IS NOT A RESTRICTED, PROBATIONARY,
PROVISIONAL, SUBSTITUTE OR TEMPORARY CREDENTIAL.
ARTICLE III. LICENSURE UNDER THE COMPACT.
A. LICENSURE UNDER THIS COMPACT PERTAINS ONLY TO THE INITIAL
GRANT OF A LICENSE BY THE RECEIVING STATE. NOTHING HEREIN APPLIES TO ANY
SUBSEQUENT OR ONGOING COMPLIANCE REQUIREMENTS THAT A RECEIVING STATE
MIGHT REQUIRE FOR TEACHERS.
B. EACH MEMBER STATE SHALL, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RULES OF
THE COMMISSION, DEFINE, COMPILE, AND UPDATE AS NECESSARY, A LIST OF
ELIGIBLE LICENSES AND CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION LICENSES THAT
THE MEMBER STATE IS WILLING TO CONSIDER FOR EQUIVALENCY UNDER THIS
COMPACT AND PROVIDE THE LIST TO THE COMMISSION. THE LIST SHALL INCLUDE
THOSE LICENSES THAT A RECEIVING STATE IS WILLING TO GRANT TO TEACHERS

HOUSE BILL 118
FROM OTHER MEMBER STATES, PENDING A DETERMINATION OF EQUIVALENCY BY
THE RECEIVING STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY.
C. UPON THE RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION FOR LICENSURE BY A
TEACHER HOLDING AN UNENCUMBERED ELIGIBLE LICENSE, THE RECEIVING
STATE SHALL DETERMINE WHICH OF THE RECEIVING STATE’S ELIGIBLE LICENSES
THE TEACHER IS QUALIFIED TO HOLD AND SHALL GRANT SUCH A LICENSE OR
LICENSES TO THE APPLICANT. SUCH A DETERMINATION SHALL BE MADE IN THE
SOLE DISCRETION OF THE RECEIVING STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY AND MAY
INCLUDE A DETERMINATION THAT THE APPLICANT IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR ANY OF
THE RECEIVING STATE’S ELIGIBLE LICENSES. FOR ALL TEACHERS WHO HOLD AN
UNENCUMBERED LICENSE, THE RECEIVING STATE SHALL GRANT ONE OR MORE
UNENCUMBERED LICENSE(S) THAT, IN THE RECEIVING STATE’S SOLE DISCRETION,
ARE EQUIVALENT TO THE LICENSE(S) HELD BY THE TEACHER IN ANY OTHER
MEMBER STATE.
D. FOR ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS AND ELIGIBLE MILITARY SPOUSES
WHO HOLD A LICENSE THAT IS NOT UNENCUMBERED, THE RECEIVING STATE SHALL
GRANT AN EQUIVALENT LICENSE OR LICENSES THAT, IN THE RECEIVING STATE’S
SOLE DISCRETION, IS EQUIVALENT TO THE LICENSE OR LICENSES HELD BY THE
TEACHER IN ANY OTHER MEMBER STATE, EXCEPT WHERE THE RECEIVING STATE
DOES NOT HAVE AN EQUIVALENT LICENSE.
E. FOR A TEACHER HOLDING AN UNENCUMBERED CAREER AND
TECHNICAL EDUCATION LICENSE, THE RECEIVING STATE SHALL GRANT AN
UNENCUMBERED LICENSE EQUIVALENT TO THE CAREER AND TECHNICAL
EDUCATION LICENSE HELD BY THE APPLYING TEACHER AND ISSUED BY ANOTHER
MEMBER STATE, AS DETERMINED BY THE RECEIVING STATE IN ITS SOLE
DISCRETION, EXCEPT WHERE A CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION TEACHER
DOES NOT HOLD A BACHELOR’S DEGREE AND THE RECEIVING STATE REQUIRES A
BACHELOR’S DEGREE FOR LICENSES TO TEACH CAREER AND TECHNICAL
EDUCATION. A RECEIVING STATE MAY REQUIRE CAREER AND TECHNICAL
EDUCATION TEACHERS TO MEET STATE INDUSTRY RECOGNIZED REQUIREMENTS,
IF REQUIRED BY LAW IN THE RECEIVING STATE.
ARTICLE IV. LICENSURE NOT UNDER THE COMPACT.
A. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ARTICLE III ABOVE, NOTHING IN THIS
COMPACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT OR INHIBIT THE POWER OF A MEMBER
STATE TO REGULATE LICENSURE OR ENDORSEMENTS OVERSEEN BY THE MEMBER
STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY.

HOUSE BILL 118 9
B. WHEN A TEACHER IS REQUIRED TO RENEW A LICENSE RECEIVED
PURSUANT TO THIS COMPACT, THE STATE GRANTING SUCH A LICENSE MAY
REQUIRE THE TEACHER TO COMPLETE STATE SPECIFIC REQUIREMENTS AS A
CONDITION OF LICENSURE RENEWAL OR ADVANCEMENT IN THAT STATE.
C. FOR THE PURPOSES OF DETERMINING COMPENSATION, A RECEIVING
STATE MAY REQUIRE ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FROM TEACHERS RECEIVING A
LICENSE UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT.
D. NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE
POWER OF A MEMBER STATE TO CONTROL AND MAINTAIN OWNERSHIP OF ITS
INFORMATION PERTAINING TO TEACHERS, OR LIMIT THE APPLICATION OF A
MEMBER STATE’S LAWS OR REGULATIONS GOVERNING THE OWNERSHIP, USE, OR
DISSEMINATION OF INFORMATION PERTAINING TO TEACHERS.
E. NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO INVALIDATE OR
ALTER ANY EXISTING AGREEMENT OR OTHER COOPERATIVE ARRANGEMENT THAT A
MEMBER STATE MAY ALREADY BE A PARTY TO, OR LIMIT THE ABILITY OF A MEMBER
STATE TO PARTICIPATE IN ANY FUTURE AGREEMENT OR OTHER COOPERATIVE
ARRANGEMENT TO:
1. AWARD TEACHING LICENSES OR OTHER BENEFITS BASED ON
ADDITIONAL PROFESSIONAL CREDENTIALS, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO
NATIONAL BOARD CERTIFICATION;
2. PARTICIPATE IN THE EXCHANGE OF NAMES OF TEACHERS WHOSE
LICENSE HAS BEEN SUBJECT TO AN ADVERSE ACTION BY A MEMBER STATE; OR
3. PARTICIPATE IN ANY AGREEMENT OR COOPERATIVE
ARRANGEMENT WITH A NON–MEMBER STATE.
ARTICLE V. TEACHER QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR LICENSURE
UNDER THE COMPACT.
A. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED FOR ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS OR ELIGIBLE
MILITARY SPOUSES IN ARTICLE III.D ABOVE, A TEACHER MAY ONLY BE ELIGIBLE
TO RECEIVE A LICENSE UNDER THIS COMPACT WHERE THAT TEACHER HOLDS AN
UNENCUMBERED LICENSE IN A MEMBER STATE.
B. A TEACHER ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE A LICENSE UNDER THIS COMPACT
SHALL, UNLESS OTHERWISE PROVIDED FOR HEREIN:

HOUSE BILL 118
1. UPON THEIR APPLICATION TO RECEIVE A LICENSE UNDER THIS
COMPACT, UNDERGO A CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK IN THE
RECEIVING STATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAWS AND REGULATIONS OF THE
RECEIVING STATE; AND
2. PROVIDE THE RECEIVING STATE WITH INFORMATION IN
ADDITION TO THE INFORMATION REQUIRED FOR LICENSURE FOR THE PURPOSES OF
DETERMINING COMPENSATION, IF APPLICABLE.
ARTICLE VI. DISCIPLINE AND ADVERSE ACTIONS.
A. NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE DEEMED OR CONSTRUED TO
LIMIT THE AUTHORITY OF A MEMBER STATE TO INVESTIGATE OR IMPOSE
DISCIPLINARY MEASURES ON TEACHERS ACCORDING TO THE STATE PRACTICE
LAWS THEREOF.
B. MEMBER STATES SHALL BE AUTHORIZED TO RECEIVE, AND SHALL
PROVIDE, FILES AND INFORMATION REGARDING THE INVESTIGATION AND
DISCIPLINE, IF ANY, OF TEACHERS IN OTHER MEMBER STATES UPON REQUEST. ANY
MEMBER STATE RECEIVING SUCH INFORMATION OR FILES SHALL PROTECT AND
MAINTAIN THE SECURITY AND CONFIDENTIALITY THEREOF, IN AT LEAST THE SAME
MANNER THAT IT MAINTAINS ITS OWN INVESTIGATORY OR DISCIPLINARY FILES AND
INFORMATION. PRIOR TO DISCLOSING ANY DISCIPLINARY OR INVESTIGATORY
INFORMATION RECEIVED FROM ANOTHER MEMBER STATE, THE DISCLOSING STATE
SHALL COMMUNICATE ITS INTENTION AND PURPOSE FOR SUCH DISCLOSURE TO THE
MEMBER STATE THAT ORIGINALLY PROVIDED THAT INFORMATION.
ARTICLE VII. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE INTERSTATE TEACHER MOBILITY
COMPACT COMMISSION.
A. THE INTERSTATE COMPACT MEMBER STATES HEREBY CREATE AND
ESTABLISH A JOINT PUBLIC AGENCY KNOWN AS THE INTERSTATE TEACHER
MOBILITY COMPACT COMMISSION:
1. THE COMMISSION IS A JOINT INTERSTATE GOVERNMENTAL
AGENCY COMPRISED OF STATES THAT HAVE ENACTED THE INTERSTATE TEACHER
MOBILITY COMPACT.
2. NOTHING IN THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT SHALL BE CONSTRUED
TO BE A WAIVER OF SOVEREIGN IMMUNITY.
B. MEMBERSHIP, VOTING, AND MEETINGS.

HOUSE BILL 118 11
1. EACH MEMBER STATE SHALL HAVE AND BE LIMITED TO ONE (1)
DELEGATE TO THE COMMISSION, WHO SHALL BE GIVEN THE TITLE OF
COMMISSIONER.
2. THE COMMISSIONER SHALL BE THE PRIMARY ADMINISTRATIVE
OFFICER OF THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY OR THEIR DESIGNEE.
3. ANY COMMISSIONER MAY BE REMOVED OR SUSPENDED FROM
OFFICE AS PROVIDED BY THE LAW OF THE STATE FROM WHICH THE COMMISSIONER
IS APPOINTED.
4. THE MEMBER STATE SHALL FILL ANY VACANCY OCCURRING IN
THE COMMISSION WITHIN 90 DAYS.
5. EACH COMMISSIONER SHALL BE ENTITLED TO ONE (1) VOTE
ABOUT THE PROMULGATION OF RULES AND CREATION OF BYLAWS AND SHALL
OTHERWISE HAVE AN OPPORTUNITY TO PARTICIPATE IN THE BUSINESS AND
AFFAIRS OF THE COMMISSION. A COMMISSIONER SHALL VOTE IN PERSON OR BY
SUCH OTHER MEANS AS PROVIDED IN THE BYLAWS. THE BYLAWS MAY PROVIDE FOR
COMMISSIONERS’ PARTICIPATION IN MEETINGS BY TELEPHONE OR OTHER MEANS
OF COMMUNICATION.
6. THE COMMISSION SHALL MEET AT LEAST ONCE DURING EACH
CALENDAR YEAR. ADDITIONAL MEETINGS SHALL BE HELD AS SET FORTH IN THE
BYLAWS.
7. THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH BY RULE A TERM OF OFFICE
FOR COMMISSIONERS.
C. THE COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING POWERS AND DUTIES.
1. ESTABLISH A CODE OF ETHICS FOR THE COMMISSION.
2. ESTABLISH THE FISCAL YEAR OF THE COMMISSION.
3. ESTABLISH BYLAWS FOR THE COMMISSION.
4. MAINTAIN ITS FINANCIAL RECORDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
BYLAWS OF THE COMMISSION.
5. MEET AND TAKE SUCH ACTIONS AS ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT, THE BYLAWS, AND RULES OF THE
COMMISSION.

HOUSE BILL 118
6. PROMULGATE UNIFORM RULES TO IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER
THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT. THE RULES SHALL HAVE THE FORCE AND EFFECT OF
LAW AND SHALL BE BINDING IN ALL MEMBER STATES. IN THE EVENT THE
COMMISSION EXERCISES ITS RULEMAKING AUTHORITY IN A MANNER THAT IS
BEYOND THE SCOPE OF THE PURPOSES OF THE COMPACT, OR THE POWERS
GRANTED HEREUNDER, THEN SUCH AN ACTION BY THE COMMISSION SHALL BE
INVALID AND HAVE NO FORCE AND EFFECT OF LAW.
7. BRING AND PROSECUTE LEGAL PROCEEDINGS OR ACTIONS IN
THE NAME OF THE COMMISSION, PROVIDED THAT THE STANDING OF ANY MEMBER
STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY TO SUE OR BE SUED UNDER APPLICABLE LAW MAY
NOT BE AFFECTED.
8. PURCHASE AND MAINTAIN INSURANCE AND BONDS.
9. BORROW, ACCEPT, OR CONTRACT FOR SERVICES OF PERSONNEL,
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, EMPLOYEES OF A MEMBER STATE, OR AN
ASSOCIATED NONGOVERNMENTAL ORGANIZATION THAT IS OPEN TO MEMBERSHIP
BY ALL STATES.
10. HIRE EMPLOYEES, ELECT OR APPOINT OFFICERS, FIX
COMPENSATION, DEFINE DUTIES, GRANT SUCH INDIVIDUALS APPROPRIATE
AUTHORITY TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THE COMPACT, AND ESTABLISH THE
COMMISSION’S PERSONNEL POLICIES AND PROGRAMS RELATING TO CONFLICTS OF
INTEREST, QUALIFICATIONS OF PERSONNEL, AND OTHER RELATED PERSONNEL
MATTERS.
11. LEASE, PURCHASE, ACCEPT APPROPRIATE GIFTS OR DONATIONS
OF, OR OTHERWISE OWN, HOLD, IMPROVE, OR USE, ANY PROPERTY, REAL,
PERSONAL OR MIXED, PROVIDED THAT AT ALL TIMES THE COMMISSION SHALL
AVOID ANY APPEARANCE OF IMPROPRIETY.
12. SELL, CONVEY, MORTGAGE, PLEDGE, LEASE, EXCHANGE,
ABANDON, OR OTHERWISE DISPOSE OF ANY PROPERTY REAL, PERSONAL, OR MIXED.
13. ESTABLISH A BUDGET AND MAKE EXPENDITURES.
14. BORROW MONEY.
15. APPOINT COMMITTEES, INCLUDING STANDING COMMITTEES
COMPOSED OF MEMBERS AND SUCH OTHER INTERESTED PERSONS AS MAY BE
DESIGNATED IN THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT, RULES, OR BYLAWS.

HOUSE BILL 118 13
16. PROVIDE AND RECEIVE INFORMATION FROM, AND COOPERATE
WITH, LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES.
17. ESTABLISH AND ELECT AN EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE.
18. ESTABLISH AND DEVELOP A CHARTER FOR AN EXECUTIVE
INFORMATION GOVERNANCE COMMITTEE TO ADVISE ON FACILITATING EXCHANGE
OF INFORMATION, USE OF INFORMATION, DATA PRIVACY, AND TECHNICAL SUPPORT
NEEDS, AND PROVIDE REPORTS AS NEEDED.
19. PERFORM SUCH OTHER FUNCTIONS AS MAY BE NECESSARY OR
APPROPRIATE TO ACHIEVE THE PURPOSES OF THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT
CONSISTENT WITH THE STATE REGULATION OF TEACHER LICENSURE.
20. DETERMINE WHETHER A STATE’S ADOPTED LANGUAGE IS
MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT LANGUAGE SUCH THAT THE
STATE WOULD NOT QUALIFY FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT.
D. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OF THE INTERSTATE TEACHER MOBILITY
COMPACT COMMISSION.
1. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL HAVE THE POWER TO ACT ON
BEHALF OF THE COMMISSION ACCORDING TO THE TERMS OF THIS INTERSTATE
COMPACT.
2. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL BE COMPOSED OF EIGHT
VOTING MEMBERS:
A. THE COMMISSION CHAIR, VICE CHAIR, AND TREASURER;
AND
B. FIVE MEMBERS WHO ARE ELECTED BY THE COMMISSION
FROM THE CURRENT MEMBERSHIP:
I. FOUR VOTING MEMBERS REPRESENTING
GEOGRAPHIC REGIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH COMMISSION RULES; AND
II. ONE AT LARGE VOTING MEMBER IN ACCORDANCE
WITH COMMISSION RULES.
3. THE COMMISSION MAY ADD OR REMOVE MEMBERS OF THE
EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE AS PROVIDED IN COMMISSION RULES.

HOUSE BILL 118
4. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL MEET AT LEAST ONCE
ANNUALLY.
5. THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING
DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
A. RECOMMEND TO THE ENTIRE COMMISSION CHANGES TO
THE RULES OR BYLAWS, CHANGES TO THE COMPACT LEGISLATION, FEES PAID BY
INTERSTATE COMPACT MEMBER STATES SUCH AS ANNUAL DUES, AND ANY
COMPACT FEE CHARGED BY THE MEMBER STATES ON BEHALF OF THE COMMISSION.
B. ENSURE COMMISSION ADMINISTRATION SERVICES ARE
APPROPRIATELY PROVIDED, CONTRACTUAL OR OTHERWISE.
C. PREPARE AND RECOMMEND THE BUDGET.
D. MAINTAIN FINANCIAL RECORDS ON BEHALF OF THE
COMMISSION.
E. MONITOR COMPLIANCE OF MEMBER STATES AND PROVIDE
REPORTS TO THE COMMISSION.
F. PERFORM OTHER DUTIES AS PROVIDED IN RULES OR
BYLAWS.
6. MEETINGS OF THE COMMISSION.
A. ALL MEETINGS SHALL BE OPEN TO THE PUBLIC, AND
PUBLIC NOTICE OF MEETINGS SHALL BE GIVEN IN ACCORDANCE WITH COMMISSION
BYLAWS.
B. THE COMMISSION OR THE EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OR
OTHER COMMITTEES OF THE COMMISSION MAY CONVENE IN A CLOSED,
NON–PUBLIC MEETING IF THE COMMISSION OR EXECUTIVE COMMITTEE OR OTHER
COMMITTEES OF THE COMMISSION MUST DISCUSS:
I. NONCOMPLIANCE OF A MEMBER STATE WITH ITS
OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE COMPACT.
II. THE EMPLOYMENT, COMPENSATION, DISCIPLINE OR
OTHER MATTERS, PRACTICES OR PROCEDURES RELATED TO SPECIFIC EMPLOYEES

HOUSE BILL 118 15
OR OTHER MATTERS RELATED TO THE COMMISSION’S INTERNAL PERSONNEL
PRACTICES AND PROCEDURES.
III. CURRENT, THREATENED, OR REASONABLY
ANTICIPATED LITIGATION.
IV. NEGOTIATION OF CONTRACTS FOR THE PURCHASE,
LEASE, OR SALE OF GOODS, SERVICES, OR REAL ESTATE.
V. ACCUSING ANY PERSON OF A CRIME OR FORMALLY
CENSURING ANY PERSON.
VI. DISCLOSURE OF TRADE SECRETS OR COMMERCIAL
OR FINANCIAL INFORMATION THAT IS PRIVILEGED OR CONFIDENTIAL.
VII. DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION OF A PERSONAL
NATURE WHERE DISCLOSURE WOULD CONSTITUTE A CLEARLY UNWARRANTED
INVASION OF PERSONAL PRIVACY.
VIII. DISCLOSURE OF INVESTIGATIVE RECORDS COMPILED
FOR LAW ENFORCEMENT PURPOSES.
IX. DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION RELATED TO ANY
INVESTIGATIVE REPORTS PREPARED BY OR ON BEHALF OF OR FOR USE OF THE
COMMISSION OR OTHER COMMITTEE CHARGED WITH RESPONSIBILITY OF
INVESTIGATION OR DETERMINATION OF COMPLIANCE ISSUES PURSUANT TO THE
COMPACT.
X. MATTERS SPECIFICALLY EXEMPTED FROM
DISCLOSURE BY FEDERAL OR MEMBER STATE STATUTE.
XI. OTHER MATTERS AS SET FORTH BY COMMISSION
BYLAWS AND RULES.
C. IF A MEETING, OR PORTION OF A MEETING, IS CLOSED
PURSUANT TO THIS PROVISION, THE COMMISSION’S LEGAL COUNSEL OR DESIGNEE
SHALL CERTIFY THAT THE MEETING MAY BE CLOSED AND SHALL REFERENCE EACH
RELEVANT EXEMPTING PROVISION.
D. THE COMMISSION SHALL KEEP MINUTES OF COMMISSION
MEETINGS AND SHALL PROVIDE A FULL AND ACCURATE SUMMARY OF ACTIONS
TAKEN, AND THE REASONS THEREFOR, INCLUDING A DESCRIPTION OF THE VIEWS
EXPRESSED. ALL DOCUMENTS CONSIDERED IN CONNECTION WITH AN ACTION

HOUSE BILL 118
SHALL BE IDENTIFIED IN SUCH MINUTES. ALL MINUTES AND DOCUMENTS OF A
CLOSED MEETING SHALL REMAIN UNDER SEAL, SUBJECT TO RELEASE BY A
MAJORITY VOTE OF THE COMMISSION OR ORDER OF A COURT OF COMPETENT
JURISDICTION.
7. FINANCING OF THE COMMISSION.
A. THE COMMISSION SHALL PAY, OR PROVIDE FOR THE
PAYMENT OF, THE REASONABLE EXPENSES OF ITS ESTABLISHMENT, ORGANIZATION,
AND ONGOING ACTIVITIES.
B. THE COMMISSION MAY ACCEPT ALL APPROPRIATE
DONATIONS AND GRANTS OF MONEY, EQUIPMENT, SUPPLIES, MATERIALS, AND
SERVICES, AND RECEIVE, UTILIZE, AND DISPOSE OF THE SAME, PROVIDED THAT AT
ALL TIMES THE COMMISSION SHALL AVOID ANY APPEARANCE OF IMPROPRIETY OR
CONFLICT OF INTEREST.
C. THE COMMISSION MAY LEVY ON AND COLLECT AN ANNUAL
ASSESSMENT FROM EACH MEMBER STATE OR IMPOSE FEES ON OTHER PARTIES TO
COVER THE COST OF THE OPERATIONS AND ACTIVITIES OF THE COMMISSION, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE COMMISSION RULES.
D. THE COMMISSION MAY NOT INCUR OBLIGATIONS OF ANY
KIND PRIOR TO SECURING THE FUNDS ADEQUATE TO MEET THE SAME; NOR SHALL
THE COMMISSION PLEDGE THE CREDIT OF ANY OF THE MEMBER STATES, EXCEPT
BY AND WITH THE AUTHORITY OF THE MEMBER STATE.
E. THE COMMISSION SHALL KEEP ACCURATE ACCOUNTS OF
ALL RECEIPTS AND DISBURSEMENTS. THE RECEIPTS AND DISBURSEMENTS OF THE
COMMISSION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO ACCOUNTING PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED
UNDER COMMISSION BYLAWS. ALL RECEIPTS AND DISBURSEMENTS OF FUNDS OF
THE COMMISSION SHALL BE REVIEWED ANNUALLY IN ACCORDANCE WITH
COMMISSION BYLAWS, AND A REPORT OF THE REVIEW SHALL BE INCLUDED IN AND
BECOME PART OF THE ANNUAL REPORT OF THE COMMISSION.
8. QUALIFIED IMMUNITY, DEFENSE, AND INDEMNIFICATION.
A. THE MEMBERS, OFFICERS, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR,
EMPLOYEES AND REPRESENTATIVES OF THE COMMISSION SHALL BE IMMUNE FROM
SUIT AND LIABILITY, EITHER PERSONALLY OR IN THEIR OFFICIAL CAPACITY, FOR
ANY CLAIM FOR DAMAGE TO OR LOSS OF PROPERTY OR PERSONAL INJURY OR
OTHER CIVIL LIABILITY CAUSED BY OR ARISING OUT OF ANY ACTUAL OR ALLEGED
ACT, ERROR OR OMISSION THAT OCCURRED, OR THAT THE PERSON AGAINST WHOM

HOUSE BILL 118 17
THE CLAIM IS MADE HAD A REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED WITHIN
THE SCOPE OF COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES OR RESPONSIBILITIES;
PROVIDED THAT NOTHING IN THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROTECT
ANY SUCH PERSON FROM SUIT OR LIABILITY FOR ANY DAMAGE, LOSS, INJURY, OR
LIABILITY CAUSED BY THE INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL OR WANTON MISCONDUCT OF
THAT PERSON.
B. THE COMMISSION SHALL DEFEND ANY MEMBER, OFFICER,
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, EMPLOYEE, OR REPRESENTATIVE OF THE COMMISSION IN
ANY CIVIL ACTION SEEKING TO IMPOSE LIABILITY ARISING OUT OF ANY ACTUAL OR
ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION THAT OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF
COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, OR THAT THE PERSON
AGAINST WHOM THE CLAIM IS MADE HAD A REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING
OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR
RESPONSIBILITIES; PROVIDED THAT NOTHING HEREIN SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO
PROHIBIT THAT PERSON FROM RETAINING HIS OR HER OWN COUNSEL; AND
PROVIDED FURTHER, THAT THE ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION
DID NOT RESULT FROM THAT PERSON’S INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL OR WANTON
MISCONDUCT.
C. THE COMMISSION SHALL INDEMNIFY AND HOLD HARMLESS
ANY MEMBER, OFFICER, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, EMPLOYEE, OR REPRESENTATIVE
OF THE COMMISSION FOR THE AMOUNT OF ANY SETTLEMENT OR JUDGMENT
OBTAINED AGAINST THAT PERSON ARISING OUT OF ANY ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT,
ERROR OR OMISSION THAT OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF COMMISSION
EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, OR THAT SUCH PERSON HAD A
REASONABLE BASIS FOR BELIEVING OCCURRED WITHIN THE SCOPE OF
COMMISSION EMPLOYMENT, DUTIES, OR RESPONSIBILITIES, PROVIDED THAT THE
ACTUAL OR ALLEGED ACT, ERROR, OR OMISSION DID NOT RESULT FROM THE
INTENTIONAL OR WILLFUL OR WANTON MISCONDUCT OF THAT PERSON.
ARTICLE VIII. RULEMAKING.
A. THE COMMISSION SHALL EXERCISE ITS RULEMAKING POWERS
PURSUANT TO THE CRITERIA SET FORTH IN THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT AND THE
RULES ADOPTED THEREUNDER. RULES AND AMENDMENTS SHALL BECOME
BINDING AS OF THE DATE SPECIFIED IN EACH RULE OR AMENDMENT.
B. THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE REASONABLE RULES TO
ACHIEVE THE INTENT AND PURPOSE OF THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT. IN THE EVENT
THE COMMISSION EXERCISES ITS RULEMAKING AUTHORITY IN A MANNER THAT IS
BEYOND PURPOSE AND INTENT OF THIS INTERSTATE COMPACT, OR THE POWERS

HOUSE BILL 118
GRANTED HEREUNDER, THEN SUCH AN ACTION BY THE COMMISSION SHALL BE
INVALID AND HAVE NO FORCE AND EFFECT OF LAW IN THE MEMBER STATES.
C. IF A MAJORITY OF THE LEGISLATURES OF THE MEMBER STATES
REJECTS A RULE, BY ENACTMENT OF A STATUTE OR RESOLUTION IN THE SAME
MANNER USED TO ADOPT THE COMPACT WITHIN FOUR (4) YEARS OF THE DATE OF
ADOPTION OF THE RULE, THEN SUCH RULE SHALL HAVE NO FURTHER FORCE AND
EFFECT IN ANY MEMBER STATE.
D. RULES OR AMENDMENTS TO THE RULES SHALL BE ADOPTED OR
RATIFIED AT A REGULAR OR SPECIAL MEETING OF THE COMMISSION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH COMMISSION RULES AND BYLAWS.
E. UPON DETERMINATION THAT AN EMERGENCY EXISTS, THE
COMMISSION MAY CONSIDER AND ADOPT AN EMERGENCY RULE WITH 48 HOURS’
NOTICE, WITH OPPORTUNITY TO COMMENT, PROVIDED THAT THE USUAL
RULEMAKING PROCEDURES SHALL BE RETROACTIVELY APPLIED TO THE RULE AS
SOON AS REASONABLY POSSIBLE, IN NO EVENT LATER THAN NINETY (90) DAYS
AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE RULE. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS
PROVISION, AN EMERGENCY RULE IS ONE THAT MUST BE ADOPTED IMMEDIATELY
IN ORDER TO:
1. MEET AN IMMINENT THREAT TO PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, OR
WELFARE;
2. PREVENT A LOSS OF COMMISSION OR MEMBER STATE FUNDS;
3. MEET A DEADLINE FOR THE PROMULGATION OF AN
ADMINISTRATIVE RULE THAT IS ESTABLISHED BY FEDERAL LAW OR RULE; OR
4. PROTECT PUBLIC HEALTH AND SAFETY.
ARTICLE IX. FACILITATING INFORMATION EXCHANGE.
A. THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE FOR FACILITATING THE EXCHANGE
OF INFORMATION TO ADMINISTER AND IMPLEMENT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
COMPACT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION, CONSISTENT
WITH GENERALLY ACCEPTED DATA PROTECTION PRINCIPLES.
B. NOTHING IN THIS COMPACT SHALL BE DEEMED OR CONSTRUED TO
ALTER, LIMIT, OR INHIBIT THE POWER OF A MEMBER STATE TO CONTROL AND
MAINTAIN OWNERSHIP OF ITS LICENSEE INFORMATION OR ALTER, LIMIT, OR

HOUSE BILL 118 19
INHIBIT THE LAWS OR REGULATIONS GOVERNING LICENSEE INFORMATION IN THE
MEMBER STATE.
ARTICLE X. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT.
A. OVERSIGHT.
1. THE EXECUTIVE AND JUDICIAL BRANCHES OF STATE
GOVERNMENT IN EACH MEMBER STATE SHALL ENFORCE THIS COMPACT AND TAKE
ALL ACTIONS NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE TO EFFECTUATE THE COMPACT’S
PURPOSES AND INTENT. THE PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT SHALL HAVE
STANDING AS STATUTORY LAW.
2. VENUE IS PROPER AND JUDICIAL PROCEEDINGS BY OR AGAINST
THE COMMISSION SHALL BE BROUGHT SOLELY AND EXCLUSIVELY IN A COURT OF
COMPETENT JURISDICTION WHERE THE PRINCIPAL OFFICE OF THE COMMISSION IS
LOCATED. THE COMMISSION MAY WAIVE VENUE AND JURISDICTIONAL DEFENSES
TO THE EXTENT IT ADOPTS OR CONSENTS TO PARTICIPATE IN ALTERNATIVE
DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCEEDINGS. NOTHING HEREIN SHALL AFFECT OR LIMIT
THE SELECTION OR PROPRIETY OF VENUE IN ANY ACTION AGAINST A LICENSEE FOR
PROFESSIONAL MALPRACTICE, MISCONDUCT OR ANY SUCH SIMILAR MATTER.
3. ALL COURTS AND ALL ADMINISTRATIVE AGENCIES SHALL TAKE
JUDICIAL NOTICE OF THE COMPACT, THE RULES OF THE COMMISSION, AND ANY
INFORMATION PROVIDED TO A MEMBER STATE PURSUANT THERETO IN ANY
JUDICIAL OR QUASI–JUDICIAL PROCEEDING IN A MEMBER STATE PERTAINING TO
THE SUBJECT MATTER OF THIS COMPACT, OR WHICH MAY AFFECT THE POWERS,
RESPONSIBILITIES, OR ACTIONS OF THE COMMISSION.
4. THE COMMISSION SHALL BE ENTITLED TO RECEIVE SERVICE OF
PROCESS IN ANY PROCEEDING REGARDING THE ENFORCEMENT OR
INTERPRETATION OF THE COMPACT AND SHALL HAVE STANDING TO INTERVENE IN
SUCH A PROCEEDING FOR ALL PURPOSES. FAILURE TO PROVIDE THE COMMISSION
SERVICE OF PROCESS SHALL RENDER A JUDGMENT OR ORDER VOID AS TO THE
COMMISSION, THIS COMPACT, OR PROMULGATED RULES.
B. DEFAULT, TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE, AND TERMINATION.
1. IF THE COMMISSION DETERMINES THAT A MEMBER STATE HAS
DEFAULTED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF ITS OBLIGATIONS OR RESPONSIBILITIES
UNDER THIS COMPACT OR THE PROMULGATED RULES, THE COMMISSION SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 118
A. PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE DEFAULTING STATE
AND OTHER MEMBER STATES OF THE NATURE OF THE DEFAULT, THE PROPOSED
MEANS OF CURING THE DEFAULT OR ANY OTHER ACTION TO BE TAKEN BY THE
COMMISSION; AND
B. PROVIDE REMEDIAL TRAINING AND SPECIFIC TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE REGARDING THE DEFAULT.
C. IF A STATE IN DEFAULT FAILS TO CURE THE DEFAULT, THE DEFAULTING
STATE MAY BE TERMINATED FROM THE COMPACT UPON AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF
A MAJORITY OF THE COMMISSIONERS OF THE MEMBER STATES, AND ALL RIGHTS,
PRIVILEGES AND BENEFITS CONFERRED ON THAT STATE BY THIS COMPACT MAY BE
TERMINATED ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION. A CURE OF THE DEFAULT
DOES NOT RELIEVE THE OFFENDING STATE OF OBLIGATIONS OR LIABILITIES
INCURRED DURING THE PERIOD OF DEFAULT.
D. TERMINATION OF MEMBERSHIP IN THE COMPACT SHALL BE IMPOSED
ONLY AFTER ALL OTHER MEANS OF SECURING COMPLIANCE HAVE BEEN
EXHAUSTED. NOTICE OF INTENT TO SUSPEND OR TERMINATE SHALL BE GIVEN BY
THE COMMISSION TO THE GOVERNOR, THE MAJORITY AND MINORITY LEADERS OF
THE DEFAULTING STATE’S LEGISLATURE, THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY AND
EACH OF THE MEMBER STATES.
E. A STATE THAT HAS BEEN TERMINATED IS RESPONSIBLE FOR ALL
ASSESSMENTS, OBLIGATIONS, AND LIABILITIES INCURRED THROUGH THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION, INCLUDING OBLIGATIONS THAT EXTEND
BEYOND THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF TERMINATION.
F. THE COMMISSION MAY NOT BEAR ANY COSTS RELATED TO A STATE
THAT IS FOUND TO BE IN DEFAULT OR THAT HAS BEEN TERMINATED FROM THE
COMPACT, UNLESS AGREED UPON IN WRITING BETWEEN THE COMMISSION AND THE
DEFAULTING STATE.
G. THE DEFAULTING STATE MAY APPEAL THE ACTION OF THE
COMMISSION BY PETITIONING THE U.S. DISTRICT COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF
COLUMBIA OR THE FEDERAL DISTRICT WHERE THE COMMISSION HAS ITS
PRINCIPAL OFFICES. THE PREVAILING PARTY SHALL BE AWARDED ALL COSTS OF
SUCH LITIGATION, INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
H. DISPUTE RESOLUTION.

HOUSE BILL 118 21
1. UPON REQUEST BY A MEMBER STATE, THE COMMISSION SHALL
ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE DISPUTES RELATED TO THE COMPACT THAT ARISE AMONG
MEMBER STATES AND BETWEEN MEMBER AND NON–MEMBER STATES.
2. THE COMMISSION SHALL PROMULGATE A RULE PROVIDING FOR
BOTH BINDING AND NON–BINDING ALTERNATIVE DISPUTE RESOLUTION FOR
DISPUTES AS APPROPRIATE.
I. ENFORCEMENT.
1. THE COMMISSION, IN THE REASONABLE EXERCISE OF ITS
DISCRETION, SHALL ENFORCE THE PROVISIONS AND RULES OF THIS COMPACT.
2. BY MAJORITY VOTE, THE COMMISSION MAY INITIATE LEGAL
ACTION IN THE UNITED STATES DISTRICT COURT FOR THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OR THE FEDERAL DISTRICT WHERE THE COMMISSION HAS ITS PRINCIPAL OFFICES
AGAINST A MEMBER STATE IN DEFAULT TO ENFORCE COMPLIANCE WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF THE COMPACT AND ITS PROMULGATED RULES AND BYLAWS. THE
RELIEF SOUGHT MAY INCLUDE BOTH INJUNCTIVE RELIEF AND DAMAGES. IN THE
EVENT JUDICIAL ENFORCEMENT IS NECESSARY, THE PREVAILING PARTY SHALL BE
AWARDED ALL COSTS OF SUCH LITIGATION, INCLUDING REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S
FEES. THE REMEDIES HEREIN MAY NOT BE THE EXCLUSIVE REMEDIES OF THE
COMMISSION. THE COMMISSION MAY PURSUE ANY OTHER REMEDIES AVAILABLE
UNDER FEDERAL OR STATE LAW.
ARTICLE XI. EFFECTUATION, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT.
A. THE COMPACT SHALL COME INTO EFFECT ON THE DATE ON WHICH THE
COMPACT STATUTE IS ENACTED INTO LAW IN THE TENTH MEMBER STATE.
1. ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE COMPACT, THE
COMMISSION SHALL CONVENE AND REVIEW THE ENACTMENT OF EACH OF THE
CHARTER MEMBER STATES TO DETERMINE IF THE STATUTE ENACTED BY EACH
SUCH CHARTER MEMBER STATE IS MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL
COMPACT STATUTE.
2. A CHARTER MEMBER STATE WHOSE ENACTMENT IS FOUND TO BE
MATERIALLY DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT STATUTE SHALL BE
ENTITLED TO THE DEFAULT PROCESS SET FORTH IN ARTICLE X.
3. MEMBER STATES ENACTING THE COMPACT SUBSEQUENT TO THE
CHARTER MEMBER STATES SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE PROCESS SET FORTH IN
ARTICLE VII.C.20 TO DETERMINE IF THEIR ENACTMENTS ARE MATERIALLY

HOUSE BILL 118
DIFFERENT FROM THE MODEL COMPACT STATUTE AND WHETHER THEY QUALIFY
FOR PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT.
B. IF ANY MEMBER STATE IS LATER FOUND TO BE IN DEFAULT, OR IS
TERMINATED OR WITHDRAWS FROM THE COMPACT, THE COMMISSION SHALL
REMAIN IN EXISTENCE AND THE COMPACT SHALL REMAIN IN EFFECT EVEN IF THE
NUMBER OF MEMBER STATES SHOULD BE LESS THAN TEN.
C. ANY STATE THAT JOINS THE COMPACT AFTER THE COMMISSION’S
INITIAL ADOPTION OF THE RULES AND BYLAWS SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE RULES
AND BYLAWS AS THEY EXIST ON THE DATE ON WHICH THE COMPACT BECOMES LAW
IN THAT STATE. ANY RULE THAT HAS BEEN PREVIOUSLY ADOPTED BY THE
COMMISSION SHALL HAVE THE FULL FORCE AND EFFECT OF LAW ON THE DAY THE
COMPACT BECOMES LAW IN THAT STATE, AS THE RULES AND BYLAWS MAY BE
AMENDED AS PROVIDED IN THIS COMPACT.
D. ANY MEMBER STATE MAY WITHDRAW FROM THIS COMPACT BY
ENACTING A STATUTE REPEALING THE SAME.
1. A MEMBER STATE’S WITHDRAWAL MAY NOT TAKE EFFECT UNTIL
SIX (6) MONTHS AFTER ENACTMENT OF THE REPEALING STATUTE.
2. WITHDRAWAL MAY NOT AFFECT THE CONTINUING REQUIREMENT
OF THE WITHDRAWING STATE’S LICENSING AUTHORITY TO COMPLY WITH THE
INVESTIGATIVE AND ADVERSE ACTION REPORTING REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ACT
PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF WITHDRAWAL.
E. THIS COMPACT MAY BE AMENDED BY THE MEMBER STATES. NO
AMENDMENT TO THIS COMPACT SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE AND BINDING UPON
ANY MEMBER STATE UNTIL IT IS ENACTED INTO THE LAWS OF ALL MEMBER STATES.
ARTICLE XII. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY.
THIS COMPACT SHALL BE LIBERALLY CONSTRUED TO EFFECTUATE THE
PURPOSES THEREOF. THE PROVISIONS OF THIS COMPACT SHALL BE SEVERABLE
AND IF ANY PHRASE, CLAUSE, SENTENCE, OR PROVISION OF THIS COMPACT IS
DECLARED TO BE CONTRARY TO THE CONSTITUTION OF ANY MEMBER STATE OR A
STATE SEEKING MEMBERSHIP IN THE COMPACT, OR OF THE UNITED STATES OR THE
APPLICABILITY THEREOF TO ANY OTHER GOVERNMENT, AGENCY, PERSON OR
CIRCUMSTANCE IS HELD INVALID, THE VALIDITY OF THE REMAINDER OF THIS
COMPACT AND THE APPLICABILITY THEREOF TO ANY GOVERNMENT, AGENCY,
PERSON, OR CIRCUMSTANCE MAY NOT BE AFFECTED THEREBY. IF THIS COMPACT
SHALL BE HELD CONTRARY TO THE CONSTITUTION OF ANY MEMBER STATE, THE

HOUSE BILL 118 23
COMPACT SHALL REMAIN IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT AS TO THE REMAINING
MEMBER STATES AND IN FULL FORCE AND EFFECT AS TO THE MEMBER STATE
AFFECTED AS TO ALL SEVERABLE MATTERS.
ARTICLE XIII. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS.
A. NOTHING HEREIN SHALL PREVENT OR INHIBIT THE ENFORCEMENT OF
ANY OTHER LAW OF A MEMBER STATE THAT IS NOT INCONSISTENT WITH THE
COMPACT.
B. ANY LAWS, STATUTES, REGULATIONS, OR OTHER LEGAL
REQUIREMENTS IN A MEMBER STATE IN CONFLICT WITH THE COMPACT ARE
SUPERSEDED TO THE EXTENT OF THE CONFLICT.
C. ALL PERMISSIBLE AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE COMMISSION AND THE
MEMBER STATES ARE BINDING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THEIR TERMS.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is contingent on the
enactment of substantially similar legislation in 10 other states. The State Department of
Education shall notify the Department of Legislative Services within 10 days after 10 states
have enacted legislation that is substantially similar to this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 3 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2025.